scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VTI_am.yaml
     abaabasan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indabaabasaan
     abaabasan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindabaabasaan
     abaabasan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidabaabasaan
     abaabasan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odabaabasaan
     abaabasan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: abaabasang
     abaabasan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ebaabasang
     abaabasan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: abaabasan
     abaabikizan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindabaabikizaan
     abaabikizan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odabaabikizaan
     abaabikizan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: abaabikizang
     abaabikizan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ebaabikizang
     abaabikizan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: abaabikzan
     abaagamizan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indabaagamizaan
     abaagamizan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindabaagamizaan
     abaagamizan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ndabaagamizaan
     abaagamizan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odabaagamizaan
     abaagamizan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: abaagamizang
     abaagamizan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ebaagamizang
     abaagamizan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: abaagamizan
     abizan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indabizaan
     abizan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindabizaan
     abizan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidabizaan
     abizan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odabizaan
     abizan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: abizang
     abizan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ebizang
     abizan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: abizan
     abiigizan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindabiigizaan
     abiigizan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odabiigizaan
     abiigizan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: abiigizang
     abiigizan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ebiigizang
     abiigizan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: abiigizan
     abiitan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indabiitaan
     abiitan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindabiitaan
     abiitan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidabiitaan
     abiitan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odabiitaan
     abiitan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: abiitang
     abiitan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ebiitang
     abiitan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+3Obv+3: abiitan
     abwaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indabwaadaan
     abwaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindabwaadaan
     abwaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidabwaadaan
     abwaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odabwaadaan
     abwaadan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: abwaadang
     abwaadan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ebwaadang
     abwaadan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: abwaadan
     abwewasan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indabwewasaan
     abwewasan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindabwewasaan
     abwewasan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidabwewasaan
     abwewasan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odabwewasaan
     abwewasan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: abwewasang
     abwewasan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ebwewasang
     abwewasan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: abwewasan
     achigaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indachigaadaan
     achigaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odachigaadaan 
     achigaadan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: achigaadang
     achigaadan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: echigaadang
     achigaadan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: achigaadan
     adima'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindadima'aan
     adima'an+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odadima'aan
     adima'an+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: adima'ang
     adima'an+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+1: edima'ang
     adima'an+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: adima'an
     adindan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indadindaan
     adindan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindadindaan
     adindan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidadindaan
     adindan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odadindaan
     adindan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: adindang
     adindan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: edindang
     adisan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindadisaan
     adisan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indadisaan
     adisan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odadisaan
     adisan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: adisang
     adisan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: edisang
     adisan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1: adisan
     agadendan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagadendaan
     agadendan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagadendaan
     agadendan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidagadendaan
     agadendan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagadendaan
     agadendan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agadendang
     agadendan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egadendang
     agawaateshkan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagawaateshkaan
     agawaateshkan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagawaateshkaan
     agawaateshkan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidagawaateshkaan
     agawaateshkan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagawaateshkaan
     agawaateshkan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agawaateshkang
     agawaateshkan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egawaateshkang
     agaasadezhan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagaasadezhaan
     agaasadezhan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagaasadezhaan
     agaasadezhan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agaasadezhang
     agaasadezhan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egaasadezhang
     agaasadezhan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agaasadezhan
     agaasendan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagaasendaan
     agaasendan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagaasendaan
     agaasendan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidagaasendaan
     agaasendan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagaasendaan
     agaasendan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agaasendang
     agaasendan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egaasendang
     agaasendan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+3Obv+0: agaasendan
     agaasibii'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagaasibii'aan
     agaasibii'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagaasibii'aan
     agaasibii'an+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agaasibii'ang
     agaasibii'an+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egaasibii'ang
     agaasibii'an+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agaasibii'an
     agaasikodan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagaasikodaan
     agaasikodan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagaasikodaan
     agaasikodan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agaasikodang
     agaasikodan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egaasikodang
     agaasikodan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agaasikodan
     agaasizhan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagaasizhaan
     agaasizhan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagaasizhaan
     agaasizhan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agaasizhang
     agaasizhan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egaasizhang
     agaasizhan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agaasizhan
     agaasiigizhan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagaasiigizhaan
     agaasiigizhan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagaasiigizhaan
     agaasiigizhan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agaasiigizhang
     agaasiigizhan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egaasiigizhang
     agaasiigizhan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agaasiigizhan
     agaawaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagaawaadaan
     agaawaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagaawaadaan
     agaawaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidagaawaadaan
     agaawaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagaawaadaan
     agaawaadan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agaawaadang
     agaawaadan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egaawaadang
     agaawaadan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+3Obv+0: agaawaadan
     agindan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagindaan
     agindan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagindaan
     agindan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidagindaan
     agindan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagindaan
     agindan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agindang
     agindan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egindang
     agindan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agindan 
     agogwaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagogwaadaan
     agogwaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagogwaadaan
     agogwaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidagogwaadaan
     agogwaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagogwaadaan
     agogwaadan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agogwaadang
     agogwaadan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egogwaadang
     agogwaadan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agogwaadan
     agokiwasan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagokiwasaan
     agokiwasan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagokiwasaan
     agokiwasan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidagokiwasaan
     agokiwasan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagokiwasaan
     agokiwasan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agokiwasang
     agokiwasan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egokiwasang
     agokiwasan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agokiwasan 
     agonan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagonaan
     agonan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagonaan
     agonan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidagonaan
     agonan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagonaan
     agonan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agonang
     agonan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egonang
     agonan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agonan 
     agwa'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagwa'aan
     agwa'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagwa'aan
     agwa'an+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agwa'ang
     agwa'an+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egwa'ang
     agwa'an+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agwa'an
     agwana'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagwana'aan
     agwana'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: nindagwana'aan
     agwana'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagwana'aan
     agwana'an+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agwana'ang
     agwana'an+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egwana'ang
     agwana'an+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agwana'an
     agwanendan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagwanendaan
     agwanendan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagwanendaan
     agwanendan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidagwanendaan
     agwanendan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagwanendaan
     agwanendan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agwanendang
     agwanendan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egwanendang
     agwanendan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agwanendan 
     agwaabikizan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagwaabikizaan
     agwaabikizan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagwaabikizaan
     agwaabikizan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidagwaabikizaan
     agwaabikizan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagwaabikizaan
     agwaabikizan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agwaabikizang
     agwaabikizan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egwaabikizang
     agwaabikizan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agwaabikizan 
     agwaabiidaabaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagwaabiidaabaadaan
     agwaabiidaabaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagwaabiidaabaadaan
     agwaabiidaabaadan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agwaabiidaabaadang
     agwaabiidaabaadan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egwaabiidaabaadang
     agwaabiidaabaadan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agwaabiidaabaadan
     agwaabiiga'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagwaabiiga'aan
     agwaabiiga'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagwaabiiga'aan
     agwaabiiga'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagwaabiiga'aan
     agwaabiiga'an+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agwaabiiga'ang
     agwaabiiga'an+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egwaabiiga'ang
     agwaabiiga'an+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agwaabiiga'an 
     agwaabiiginan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagwaabiiginaan
     agwaabiiginan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagwaabiiginaan
     agwaabiiginan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agwaabiiginang
     agwaabiiginan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egwaabiiginang
     agwaabiiginan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1: agwaabiiginan
     agwaabii'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagwaabii'aan
     agwaabii'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagwaabii'aan
     agwaabii'an+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Pl+0: agwaabii'ang
     agwaabii'an+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egwaabii'ang
     agwaabii'an+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0: agwaabii'an
     agwaadaabaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagwaadaabaadaan
     agwaadaabaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagwaadaabaadaan
     agwaadaabaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidagwaadaabaadaan
     agwaadaabaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagwaadaabaadaan
     agwaadaabaadan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agwaadaabaadang
     agwaadaabaadan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egwaadaabaadang
     agwaadaabaadan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agwaadaabaadan
     agwaa'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagwaa'aan
     agwaa'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagwaa'aan
     agwaa'an+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agwaa'ang
     agwaa'an+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egwaa'ang
     agwaa'an+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agwaa'an
     agwaa'iskomaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagwaa'iskomaadaan
     agwaa'iskomaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagwaa'iskomaadaan
     agwaa'iskomaadan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agwaa'iskomaadang
     agwaa'iskomaadan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egwaa'iskomaadang
     agwaa'iskomaadan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agwaa'iskomaadan
     agwaakwa'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagwaakwa'aan
     agwaakwa'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagwaakwa'aan
     agwaakwa'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidagwaakwa'aan
     agwaakwa'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagwaakwa'aan
     agwaakwa'an+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agwaakwa'ang
     agwaakwa'an+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egwaakwa'ang
     agwaakwa'an+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agwaakwa'an 
     agwaaweba'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagwaaweba'aan
     agwaaweba'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagwaaweba'aan
